Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1203.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.3(6) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:* * *(6) [A] As follows:(i) Except as provided under subclause (ii), a transfer between all of the following:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (A) Between husband and wife[, between].(B) Between persons who were previously husband and wife who have since been divorced, provided the property or interest therein subject to such transfer was acquired by the husband and wife or husband or wife prior to the granting of the final decree in divorce[, between].(C) Between parent and child or the spouse of such child[, between].(D) Between the estate of a deceased parent or child and a parent or child of such deceased parent or child.(E) Between a stepparent and a stepchild or the spouse of the stepchild[, between].(F) Between brother or sister or spouse of a brother or sister and brother or sister or the spouse of a brother or sister [and between].(G) Between a grandparent and grandchild or the spouse of such grandchild[, except that a].(ii) A subsequent transfer by the grantee under subclause (i) within one year shall be subject to tax as if the grantor were making such transfer.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 1102-C.3(6) of the act shall apply to transactions that occur after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1203PN1351 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324